Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202021-2,219
Foreign corporation; reinstatement.

(a) A foreign corporation, the certificate of authority of which has been administratively revoked under section 21-2,218, may apply to the Secretary of State for reinstatement within five years after the effective date of the revocation. The application must:

(1) Recite the name of the foreign corporation and the effective date of the revocation;

(2) State that the ground or grounds for revocation either did not exist or have been eliminated; and

(3) State that the foreign corporation's name satisfies the requirements of section 21-2,208.

(b) If the Secretary of State determines (1) that the application for reinstatement contains the information required by subsection (a) of this section and that the information is correct and (2) that the foreign corporation has paid to the Secretary of State all delinquent fees and has delivered to the Secretary of State a properly executed and signed biennial report, he or she shall cancel the certificate of revocation, prepare a certificate of reinstatement that recites his or her determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate, and serve a copy on the foreign corporation under section 21-2,212.

(c) A foreign corporation, the certificate of authority of which has been administratively revoked under section 21-2,218 for more than five years, may apply to the Secretary of State for late reinstatement. The application, along with the fee set forth in section 21-205, must:

(1) Recite the name of the foreign corporation and the effective date of the revocation;

(2) State that the ground or grounds for revocation either did not exist or have been eliminated;

(3) State that the foreign corporation's name satisfies the requirements of section 21-2,208;

(4) State that a legitimate reason exists for reinstatement and what such legitimate reason is; and

(5) State that such reinstatement does not constitute fraud on the public.

(d) If the Secretary of State determines (1) that the application for late reinstatement contains the information required by subsection (c) of this section and that the information is correct and (2) that the foreign corporation has paid to the Secretary of State all delinquent fees and has delivered to the Secretary of State a properly executed and signed biennial report, he or she shall cancel the certificate of revocation, prepare a certificate of late reinstatement that recites his or her determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate, and serve a copy on the foreign corporation under section 21-2,212.

(e) When the reinstatement is effective, it relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the revocation and the foreign corporation shall resume carrying on its business as if the revocation had never occurred.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 219;

Laws 2015, LB279, § 5.